Nevada, session 83, AB86.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 528.042 is hereby amended to read as follows:
528.042 1. Prior to any logging [or cutting] operation, any
timber owner or the agent of the timber owner shall secure a logging
permit from the State Forester Firewarden.
2. Application for such permit shall be made to the nearest
office of the Division of Forestry of the State Department of
Conservation and Natural Resources.
Sec. 1.3. NRS 528.057 is hereby amended to read as follows:
528.057 1. Every timber owner or operator, upon completion
of his or her logging [or cutting] operation, shall sow suitable grass
seed on skid trails, skid roads, unmaintained roads and landings to
help maintain the productive condition of the cut-over timberlands.
Drill seedings shall be done where feasible.
2. The seed shall:
(a) Be approved by the State Forester Firewarden;
(b) Not be sown during windy weather or when the ground is
frozen or under any other unsuitable conditions; and
(c) Be spread evenly at not less than 12 pounds per acre when
moisture conditions are favorable.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
Sec. 1.7. NRS 528.086 is hereby amended to read as follows:
528.086 Prior to any logging [or cutting] operation on any land
covered by a timberland conversion certificate, the holder shall
furnish a copy of such certificate to any timber operator harvesting
forest products on such land.
Sec. 2. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)